Washington statutes.
RCW 18.205.100

Educational programs and alternative training—Supervision—Standards and procedures—Established by rule.

The secretary may establish by rule the standards and procedures for approval of educational programs and alternative training. The requirements for who may provide approved supervision towards training must be the same for all applicants in the regular or alternative training pathways. The requirements for who may provide approved supervision towards training must allow approved supervision to be provided by a person who meets or exceeds the requirements of a certified substance use disorder professional in the state of Washington and who would be eligible to take the examination required for certification. The secretary may utilize or contract with individuals or organizations having expertise in the profession or in education to assist in the evaluations. The secretary shall establish by rule the standards and procedures for revocation of approval of educational programs. The standards and procedures set shall apply equally to educational programs and training in the United States and in foreign jurisdictions. The secretary may establish a fee for educational program evaluations.

[ 2019 c 444 s 7; 2000 c 171 s 42; 1998 c 243 s 10.]